Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 3

Toll Ferries [Repealed]

54-13-301. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1241 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 25, § 1); Shan., § 1696; Code 1932, § 3004; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1711; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-302. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1242 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 25, § 2); Shan., § 1697; Code 1932, § 3005; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1712; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-303. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1243 (deriv. Acts 1807, ch. 25, § 2); Shan., § 1698; Code 1932, § 3006; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1713; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-304. [Repealed.]

Acts 1921, ch. 76, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1700a1; Code 1932, § 3007; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1714; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-305. [Repealed.]

Acts 1921, ch. 76, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1700a2; Code 1932, § 3008; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1715; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-306. [Repealed.]

Acts 1921, ch. 76, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1700a3; mod. Code 1932, § 3009; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1716; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-307. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1246 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 134, §§ 1, 3); Shan., § 1701; Code 1932, § 3010; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1717; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-308. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1247 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 134, § 1); Shan., § 1702; Code 1932, § 3011; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1718; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-309. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1248 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 15); Shan., § 1703; Code 1932, § 3012; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1719; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-310. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1249 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 15); Shan., § 1704; Code 1932, § 3013; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1720; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-311. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1250 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 15); Shan., § 1705; Code 1932, § 3014; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1721; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-312. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1251 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 15); Shan., § 1706; Code 1932, § 3015; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1722; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-313. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1256 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 96, § 1); Shan., § 1720; Code 1932, § 3039; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1723; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-314. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1252 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 1); Shan., § 1717; mod. Code 1932, § 3031; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1724; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-315. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1253 (deriv. Acts 1779 (Oct.), ch. 10, § 9); Shan., § 1717a; Code 1932, § 3032; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1725; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-316. [Repealed.]

Acts 1917, ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 1717b1 (p. 6546); mod. Code 1932, § 3033; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1726; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-317. [Repealed.]

Acts 1927, ch. 12, § 1; Code 1932, § 3034; Acts 1972, ch. 600, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1727; Acts 1989, ch. 387, § 2; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-318. [Repealed.]

Acts 1927, ch. 12, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 3035; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1728; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-319. [Repealed.]

Acts 1927, ch. 12, § 2; mod. Code 1932, § 3036; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1729; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-320. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1254 (deriv. Acts 1779 (Oct.), ch. 10, § 14); Shan., § 1718; mod. Code 1932, § 3037; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1731; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.

54-13-321. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1255 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 44, § 1); Shan., § 1719; Code 1932, § 3038; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1732; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 54-13-301 — 54-13-321, concerned toll ferries.